California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) A PRO shall register in the department’s Recycling and Disposal Reporting System, or an alternative reporting system established by the department, and annually submit to the system all of the following information on behalf of each producer who participates in the PRO’s approved plan:

(1) The aggregate quantities in total weight and the number of plastic components of covered material, by covered material category and by type of plastic component, manufactured, sold, distributed, or imported in or into the state, as the department deems necessary to determine compliance with this chapter in a form, manner, and frequency determined by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42060.

(2) The aggregate quantities in total weight and number of plastic components, of covered material by covered material category recycled as the department deems necessary to determine compliance with this chapter in a form and manner determined by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42060.

(3) For covered material not collected through a curbside collection program, the PRO shall collect, validate, and submit to the system data demonstrating take-back and dropoff and alternative collection and recycling program performance, including the amount and type of covered materials collected.

(4) Any additional information deemed necessary by the department to collect and report data pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42060.

(b) A PRO shall not require a producer who is a participant of the PRO’s approved plan to report to the PRO covered materials that the producer is required to report pursuant to another PRO’s plan or to another department-authorized stewardship organization’s plan, or that the producer directly reports to the department.

(c) A producer or PRO shall respond within 14 calendar days to a request by the department for additional data. The department may grant additional time for responding that shall not exceed 60 calendar days. To determine if an extension of time is warranted, the department shall take into account, at a minimum, all of the following considerations:

(1) The amount of data requested.

(2) Whether the producer or PRO has the data readily available.

(3) Whether the data is necessary to ensure compliance with Section 42050.

(4) Whether the producer or PRO needs to obtain the data from a third party.

(5) The producer’s or PRO’s timely compliance with any previous data requests.

(d) A producer or PRO shall maintain records of covered materials offered for sale, sold, distributed, or imported in or into the state in a form and manner established by the department that the department determines is necessary to determine if a producer is in compliance with this chapter during an audit.

(e) Data provided by producers and collected under this section shall only be used by the PRO for the purposes of this chapter. The PRO shall consider all
 information provided to it by producers in compliance with this chapter to be confidential and shall not disclose the information to other producers or the public or allow the use of the information for commercial purposes. This section does not prohibit the PRO from providing data requested by the department or from releasing aggregated data that does not identify data in connection with a specific responsible entity.

(f) A PRO shall provide contact information for any of the PRO’s registered participants to the department upon request.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 75, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 574, Sec. 26.   (AB 211)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

42053.

(a) (1) As part of its producer responsibility plan pursuant to Section 42051.1, a PRO shall establish a fee for its participants sufficient to ensure the requirements of this chapter are met by the PRO and the plan is fully implemented. The fee shall be based on a fee schedule to be developed by the PRO pursuant to subdivision (c). Development of the fee schedule shall ensure that the PRO budget included in the plan is fully funded. The fee shall not be passed on to consumers as a separate item on a receipt or invoice.

(2) The PRO shall adjust any fee schedules at least every year or more frequently if needed in order to fully cover the expenses in the approved budget.

(3) A
 producer that is a participant of a PRO’s approved plan shall pay the fee required by this section and, upon request, provide the PRO with records or other information necessary for the PRO to meet the PRO’s requirements under this chapter.

(b) During the first two years of operation and during the preparation of the plan developed pursuant to Section 42051.1, the PRO shall determine the fee schedule for each producer based on estimated costs of implementing the plan, operating costs, the cost of completing the needs assessment, and the costs to reimburse the department. In the third year and each successive year of operation, each producer shall pay an annual fee as established in the PRO plan based on the factors described in subdivision (d).

(c) The fee schedule required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:

(1) Individual assessments imposed on a producer due to unique characteristics of their covered material, as described in subdivision (d).

(2) Any adjustments pursuant to subdivision (e).

(3) The California circular economy administrative fee.

(4) Reimbursing the department for costs to administer the advisory board.

(5) Any fees associated with environmental mitigation activities associated with Section 42064.

(6) The costs of the PRO, including, but not limited to, staff and the costs associated with the development and implementation of the producer responsibility plan.

(7) Any other costs described in subdivision (j) of Section 42051.1.

(d) A PRO shall structure the fee schedule required pursuant to subdivision (a), delineated by covered material category and based on the following factors:

(1) The costs to ensure each covered material category meets the requirements of this chapter. Covered material that is easier and less expensive to recycle or compost or that is designed to be recycled into a similar covered material or a material that is easier to be composted shall be subject to lower fees. The costs may include all of the following:

(A) Costs to develop and sustain viable responsible end markets for each covered material category.

(B) Costs to collect, sort, avoid or remove contamination,
 aggregate, and transport the covered material into defined streams to support the viable responsible end markets for the remanufacturing of the covered material either through curbside collection or other means.

(C) Costs incurred by local jurisdictions or recycling service providers to process and transport covered materials in a manner and quality sufficient for acceptance by viable responsible end markets. This includes costs incurred by local jurisdictions or recycling service providers to reduce or mitigate the rate of inbound contamination by noncertified compostable products at composting facilities. These costs may vary by local jurisdiction.

(D) Other costs necessary to implement the plan and achieve the source reduction, recyclability and compostability, recycling rate, and other requirements of this chapter, including, but not limited to, ensuring that plan
 implementation avoids and minimizes negative environmental or public health impacts on disadvantaged or low-income communities or rural areas.

(E) Costs incurred by local jurisdictions or recycling service providers for any waste stream sampling and reporting required by this chapter and for any costs incurred to educate ratepayers to improve the preparation and sorting, as needed, of covered material.

(2) If recycling or composting of the covered material is made more difficult by the incorporation of specific elements, including, but not limited to, inks, labels, and adhesives that may be detrimental to recycling or composting according to the Association of Plastic Recyclers design guide or other relevant industry association, or criteria established by the department, the fee for that covered material shall be sufficient to account for the increased cost to manage that covered
 material.

(3) The commodity value of the covered material based on an independent index or the reported commodity value of materials of equivalent quality of the covered material.

(4) Costs incurred by the PRO to assist producers to meet the source reduction requirements pursuant to Section 42057.

(e) The fee required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be adjusted using malus fees or credits for participant producers, with those adjustments based on any of the following, as applicable:

(1) The percentage of postconsumer recycled content in the participant producer’s covered materials. The percentage of postconsumer recycled content shall be validated through an independent third party approved by the department to perform validation services to ensure
 that the percentage exceeds the minimum requirements for the covered material, as long as the recycled content does not disrupt the potential for future recycling.

(2) Source reduction related to right-sizing, optimization, and bulking of packaging, or concentrating the product packaged to reduce packaging.

(3) Standardization of packaging materials that simplifies the processing, marketing, sorting, and recycling or composting of covered materials.

(4) Presence of hazardous material as identified by the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, the Department of Toxic Substances Control, or the department.

(5) Actions taken by the producer, including clear and accurate disposal, recycling or composting, or reuse and refill labeling and
 instructions, that comply with Chapter 5.7 (commencing with Section 42355), including paragraph (6) of subdivision (d) of Section 42355.51, that improve consumer behavior related to sorting and proper disposal.

(6) Actions taken by the producer to accelerate source reduction and to invest in sustained and robust reuse and refill systems. The PRO may create a mechanism to allow producers to receive a credit for achieving source reduction beyond what producers of similar covered material are achieving. The revenue for that credit shall be paid for by charging producers not achieving source reduction for similar products a malus fee.

(7) Plastic covered materials derived from renewable materials shall be subject to a reduced fee relative to plastic covered material derived from a nonrenewable material.

(8) Certified
 compostable covered materials that do not contain toxic additives shall be subject to a reduced fee, as determined by the PRO.

(9) Covered material that contains toxic heavy metals, pathogens, or additives shall be subject to an increased fee.

(f) In addition to the annual schedule of fees approved in the plan, the PRO fee schedule may include a special assessment, charged to the participant producers of a particular covered material category, to be imposed on that particular category of covered material at the request of those producers if the nature of the covered material imposes unusual costs in collection or processing or requires special actions to address effective access to recycling, composting, or successful processing. The revenue from the special assessment shall be used to make system improvements for the specific covered materials or products on which the special
 assessment was applied.

(g) Fees paid to the PRO pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be used to implement the plan and fund the budget.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 848, Sec. 7.   (AB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42053.5.

(a) (1) On or before the end of the 2026–27 fiscal year, and once every three months thereafter, a PRO shall pay to the department the California circular economy administrative fee. The department shall set the fee at an amount adequate to cover the department’s and any other state agency’s full costs of implementing and enforcing this chapter. The total amount of fees collected shall not exceed the state’s actual and reasonable costs to implement and enforce this chapter. These costs may include the actual and reasonable costs associated with regulatory activities pursuant to this chapter before submission of producer responsibility plans pursuant to Section 42051.1 and annual reports pursuant to Section 42051.3.

(2) For a PRO, the administrative fee paid pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be funded by the producers that make up the PRO.

(b) The department shall deposit administrative fees paid by a PRO pursuant to subdivision (a) into the California Circular Economy Fund, which is hereby established in the State Treasury. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the fund may be expended by the department for the department’s activities pursuant to this chapter and to reimburse any outstanding loans made from other funds used to finance the initial costs of the department’s activities pursuant to this chapter. Moneys in the fund shall not be expended for any purpose not enumerated in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 75, Sec. 2.   (SB 54)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42054.

(a) A PRO shall keep minutes, books, and records that clearly reflect the activities and transactions of the PRO.

(b) The accounting books of the PRO shall be audited at least once per calendar year at the PRO’s expense by an independent public accountant certified in the United States and retained by the PRO.

(c) The PRO shall provide the audit to the department with the annual report required pursuant to Section 42051.3. The department shall review the audit for compliance with this chapter and consistency with the plan adopted pursuant to Section 42051.1 and shall post the audit publicly on its internet website. The department shall notify the PRO of any compliance issues or
 inconsistencies.

(d) (1) The department may conduct its own audit.

(2) The PRO shall reimburse the department for the costs of the department’s audit.

(3) The PRO may obtain copies of the department’s audit upon request.

(e) The department shall hold its audit confidentially to the extent described in subdivision (e) of Section 42080.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 75, Sec. 2.   (SB 54)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42055.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), an action specified in subdivision (b) that is taken by a PRO or its participants is not a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), or the Unfair Competition Law (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code).

(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply to all of the following actions taken by a PRO or its participants:

(1) The creation, implementation, or management
 of a plan approved by the department pursuant to this chapter and the types or quantities of covered material managed pursuant to an approved plan.

(2) The cost and structure of an approved plan.

(3) The establishment, administration, collection, or disbursement of any fees associated with funding the implementation of this chapter.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to an agreement that does any of the following:

(1) Fixes a price of or for covered material, except for an agreement related to costs or fees associated with participation in a plan approved or conditionally approved by the department and otherwise in accordance with this chapter.

(2) Fixes the output or production of
 covered material.

(3) Restricts the geographic area in which, or customers to whom, covered material will be sold, or where or by whom covered material may be purchased.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 75, Sec. 2.   (SB 54)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42056.

(a) A PRO, as part of its producer responsibility plan, shall set up a trust fund or an escrow account in California, into which it shall deposit all unexpended funds for use in accordance with this section if the plan terminates or is revoked or the PRO dissolves in accordance with the closure or transfer plan required pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 42051.1.

(b) If a plan terminates or is revoked, the trustee or escrow agent of a trust fund or escrow account set up pursuant to subdivision (a) shall do both of the following, starting within 30 calendar days:

(1) Accept payments directly from producers into the trust fund or escrow account that would have been made to the
 PRO before the plan’s termination or revocation.

(2) Make payments from the trust fund or escrow account as the department shall direct, in writing, to implement the most recently approved plan.

(c) If a new plan has not been approved by the department within one year after termination or revocation, the department may make modifications to the previously approved plan, as it deems necessary, and continue to direct payments from the trust fund or escrow account in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) to implement the modified plan.

(d) A trustee or escrow agent in possession of PRO funds shall, as directed by the department, transfer those funds to a successor PRO with an approved plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 75, Sec. 2.   (SB 54)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42057.

(a) (1) By January 1, 2032, a PRO acting on behalf of participants of the PRO’s approved plan shall develop and implement a plan to achieve the 25-percent reduction by weight and 25 percent by plastic component source reduction requirement for covered material sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state. The PRO shall establish enforceable agreements with each of its approved plan participants to implement this section.

(2) Source reduction shall be achieved by a PRO in the following manner:

(A) At least 10 percent of the plastic covered material sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state by its participant producers shall be source reduced through shifting a
 plastic covered material to refillable or reusable packaging or food service ware or through eliminating a plastic component.

(B) (i) The remaining source reduction of the plastic covered material sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state by its participant producers not achieved pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be source reduced through concentration, right-sizing, lightweighting, or shifting to bulk or large format packaging that allows consumers to refill home or commercial reusable containers, or shifting from a plastic covered material to a nonplastic covered material. No more than 8 percent of the plastic covered material sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state by its participant producers shall be source reduced through an alternative compliance formula developed by the PRO, subject to approval by the department, that offers source reduction credit on a sliding scale based on the ratio of
 virgin plastic to postconsumer recycled content plastic to producers who incorporate postconsumer recycled content into plastic covered material. A producer shall only receive this alternative source reduction credit if the postconsumer recycled content is able to be validated and is validated by a third party, such as the Association of Plastic Recyclers, through its APR Postconsumer Resin Certification Program, or a similar third party approved by the department, and the content does not contain intentionally added perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances.

(ii) The resulting source reduction of each action taken to optimize, eliminate, right-size, concentrate, shift to bulk or large format packaging, or switch to a nonplastic covered material shall be counted once for the purposes of meeting the source reduction requirements.

(C) By January 1, 2027, the PRO shall source
 reduce no less than 10 percent of plastic covered material sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state by its participant producers, with no less than 2 percent of plastic covered material sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state by its participant producers source reduced through shifting to reusable or refillable packaging and food service ware systems.

(D) By January 1, 2030, the PRO shall source reduce no less than 20 percent of plastic covered material sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state by its participant producers, with no less than 4 percent of plastic covered material sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state by its participant producers source reduced through shifting to reusable or refillable packaging and food service ware systems.

(b) By January 1, 2025, the department shall establish a baseline for the 25-percent reduction
 required in subdivision (a) based on the amount of plastic covered material, including the number of products packaged in covered material, that was sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state in the 2023 calendar year.

(c) As part of any producer responsibility plan, plan update, or annual report submitted to the department, the PRO shall report the following data, disaggregated by each participant producer:

(1) The amount of plastic covered material and products sold in plastic covered material, including the number of plastic components and weight of plastic covered material, sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state.

(2) The number of plastic components and the weight of plastic covered material shifted to a refillable or reusable packaging or food service ware.

(3) The number of plastic components and the weight of plastic covered material eliminated.

(4) The number of plastic components and the weight of plastic covered material shifted from a plastic covered material to a nonplastic covered material.

(5) The number of plastic components and the weight of plastic covered material reduced through concentration, right-sizing, and shifting to bulk or large format packaging that allows consumers to refill home or commercial reusable containers.

(6) The amount of postconsumer recycled content used compared to virgin plastic in covered material.

(d) Producers who are members of the PRO shall submit to the PRO individual source reduction plans that
 include both of the following:

(1) In the first individual producer source reduction plan, the producer shall include any amount of covered material, by number of plastic components and weight of covered material, the producer source reduced since January 1, 2013.

(2) The amount of plastic covered material, by number of plastic components and weight of plastic covered material, the producer plans to source reduce by January 1, 2027, January 1, 2030, and January 1, 2032. The producer shall describe how much will be source reduced in each of the following ways:

(A) The number of plastic components and the weight of plastic covered material shifted to a refillable or reusable package.

(B) The number of plastic components and the weight of plastic covered
 material eliminated.

(C) The number of plastic components and the weight of plastic covered material shifted from a plastic covered material to a nonplastic material.

(D) The number of plastic components and the weight of covered material source reduced through concentration, right-sizing, lightweighting, and shifting to bulk or large format packaging that allows consumers to refill home or commercial reusable containers.

(E) The amount of postconsumer recycled content used compared to virgin plastic in covered material.

(e) The PRO shall require producers that are participants of the PRO’s approved plan to submit to the PRO the data necessary for the PRO to report the information required pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d).

(f) As part of the producer responsibility plan, the PRO shall include a source reduction plan designed to meet the requirements of this section. The source reduction plan shall be disaggregated based on the individual producer source reduction plans and shall meet both of the following requirements:

(1) In the source reduction plan, the PRO shall give producers credit for source reduction achieved from the 2013 calendar year to the 2022 calendar year, inclusive. This amount shall not count toward the requirements of subdivision (a). Allocation of this amount, and the requirement for the PRO source reduction plan to meet the requirements of subdivision (a), may require the PRO to require a producer to revise its individual producer source reduction plan.

(2) The PRO may identify material types in the source reduction
 plan that face significant recycling or end market challenges and would require significant investment to bring into compliance with this chapter by January 1, 2032. Switching an entire identified covered material category to a reusable, refillable, or nonplastic alternative shall be considered source reduction for the purpose of subdivision (a). The PRO may report this source reduction in an aggregated form.

(g) To ensure equity in the market, the PRO shall require a producer with a covered material new to the producer subsequent to the approval of the PRO to optimize packaging and not include unnecessary covered material. The PRO shall assess a malus fee on any producer with a new covered material that is not optimized, as determined by the PRO and approved by the department pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 42051.1.

(h) To ensure source reductions achieved by January 1,
 2032, are not lost after January 1, 2032, while still allowing for businesses to grow, the department shall, beginning in the 2030 calendar year and every five years thereafter, conduct an evaluation of the plastic covered material subject to this section to determine if actions to secure greater source reductions are necessary. If the number of plastic components or weight of plastic covered material has increased, the department shall make this determination. If the department determines that there has been an increase in the number of plastic components or the overall weight of plastic covered material, the department shall take the following actions to secure greater source reductions:

(1) Require the PRO to ensure participant producers increase the rate of source reduction through shifting a plastic covered material to reusable or refillable packaging or food service ware or through eliminating plastic components. In requiring these higher
 source reduction rates, the department shall consider all of the following:

(A) The feasibility of increased source reduction rates, as determined by evaluating consumer adoption and acceptance, potential impacts to food safety, and infrastructure availability.

(B) The use of postconsumer recycled content.

(C) The degree to which reuse and refill infrastructure investments were made to improve consumer convenience and adoption.

(D) Examples of reuse and refill systems and elimination requirements in other jurisdictions.

(E) Reductions achieved through the other tools implemented by the PRO, including fees and required optimization.

(F) The percentage of growth in the number of plastic components and the overall weight of covered material.

(2) Determine if new packaging types are optimized and, if not, develop optimization requirements through regulations.

(i) Producers of expanded polystyrene food service ware shall not sell, offer for sale, distribute, or import in or into the state expanded polystyrene food service ware unless the producer demonstrates to the department that all expanded polystyrene meets the following recycling rates:

(1) Not less than 25 percent on and after January 1, 2025.

(2) Not less than 30 percent on and after January 1, 2028.

(3) Not less than 50 percent on and after January
 1, 2030.

(4) Not less than 65 percent on and after January 1, 2032, and annually thereafter.

(j) The department may adopt regulations to implement this section, including, but not limited to, reporting and collection requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 186.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Program Administration [42060. - 42067.]

42060.

(a) By January 1, 2025, the department shall adopt regulations necessary to implement and enforce this chapter and to ensure that the requirements of this chapter and in particular the requirements established in Section 42050 and the policy goal established in Section 41780.01 as it relates to covered material are met. The regulations shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Any regulations necessary to ensure the PRO fully funds plan implementation, including fully funding the budget. This shall include the costs incurred by a local jurisdiction or a local jurisdiction’s recycling service providers to implement this chapter, including, but not limited to, the cost of consumer education and of collection, including the cost of containers
 where relevant, as well as the processing, storage, and transportation of covered materials. Costs may vary based on population density or other relevant factors and shall allow local jurisdictions to protect ratepayers from increased costs associated with the processing and marketing of covered material.

(2) (A) Establish a mandatory process for producers, retailers, and wholesalers, or a PRO operating on behalf of a producer, retailer, or wholesaler, to register with and report to the department.

(B) The process shall include establishing appropriate timelines to begin regular reporting following the adoption of the regulations. The department shall consider, along with any other factors the department deems appropriate, the amount of information being reported in developing the timelines.

(C) (i) Data requests by the department shall be consistent with the covered material categories established and posted on the department’s internet website pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42061.

(ii) To the maximum extent feasible, the department shall seek to use records and information that the local jurisdiction, producer, retailer, wholesaler, or PRO already maintains, in order to minimize the burden imposed by the reporting and recordkeeping requirements while still enabling the department to determine compliance with this chapter.

(D) The department shall, to the extent feasible, make the reporting consistent with other recognized third-party reporting systems used by producers or other packaging extended producer responsibility programs.

(E) Market-sensitive trade
 secret data received by the department pursuant to this chapter shall be held confidentially by the department as required by Section 40062 and any implementing regulations, provided that the furnisher of the data complies with the requirements set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 40062 and any implementing regulations for identifying the information claimed to be a trade secret.

(F) The department shall create an online registration form to facilitate submitting reports pursuant to this subdivision. To the extent permissible under applicable law, the department may contract with an independent third-party online reporting system with recognized standards for waste characterization, source reduction, and recycling.

(3) (A) The department shall establish a process to identify covered material that, while determined to be single use for purposes of this
 chapter, presents unique challenges in complying with this chapter. The department may exempt covered material identified pursuant to this subparagraph from this chapter.

(B) For any covered material identified as presenting unique challenges and exempted from this chapter under subparagraph (A), the department may at any point develop a plan to phase the covered material into the requirements of this chapter.

(4) The department shall establish a process to identify covered material that cannot comply with this chapter for health and safety reasons, or because it is unsafe to recycle. The department may exempt that covered material from this chapter.

(5) The department shall establish a process to exempt from the requirements of this chapter, except for the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 42050, small
 producers, small retailers, and small wholesalers based on size, revenue, number of retail locations, and market share, as follows:

(A) Subject to subparagraph (B), the department shall exempt producers, retailers, or wholesalers that, in the most recent calendar year, had gross sales of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) in the state.

(B) If the department determines that exempting a particular small producer, small retailer, or small wholesaler pursuant to subparagraph (A) would hinder the ability of a type of covered material or covered material category from complying with the requirements of this chapter, the department may determine that the particular small producer, small retailer, or small wholesaler will not be exempted from the requirements of this chapter.

(6) (A) The
 department shall include mechanisms necessary to reduce the amount of covered material entering the environment, in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

(B) The department may consider reductions of covered material achieved by a producer before the effective date of the regulations toward a producer’s compliance with this chapter if the producer can demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the producer reduced the covered material in a manner consistent with this chapter and actions taken to comply with Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 42300).

(C) In calculating the reductions necessary to achieve the requirements adopted pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall consider source reduction achieved pursuant to Section 42057.

(7) The department shall establish a
 process to require coordination between a PRO and producer that is not a participant of the PRO’s approved plan and between multiple PROs as necessary. This includes determining how much each PRO shall charge producers of plastic covered material in order to prorate the funding as necessary to raise the revenue required by Section 42064.

(8) The department shall establish a methodology and process to calculate, to the extent feasible, an annual recycling rate defined in subdivision (ab) of Section 42041.

(b) (1) The department shall ensure that any regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter consider guidelines and do not conflict with regulations issued by the United States Food and Drug Administration and the United States Department of Agriculture and consider requirements imposed by other California state agencies.

(2) Neither the department nor the PRO shall impose any requirement, including, but not limited to, a recycled content requirement, in direct conflict with a federal law or regulation, including, but not limited to, laws or regulations covering tamper-evident packaging pursuant to Section 211.132 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, laws or regulations covering child-resistant packaging pursuant to Part 1700 (commencing with Section 1700.1) of Subchapter E of Chapter II of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations, regulations, rules, or guidelines issued by the United States Department of Agriculture or the United States Food and Drug Administration relevant to packaging agricultural commodities, requirements for microbial contamination, structural integrity, or safety of packaging under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.), 21 U.S.C. Sec. 2101 et seq., the federal FDA Food Safety Modernization Act
 (Public Law 111-353), the federal Poultry Products Inspection Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 451 et seq.), the Federal Meat Inspection Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.), or the federal Egg Products Inspection Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 1031 et seq.). Neither the department nor a PRO shall impose a postconsumer recycled content requirement for covered material for fresh produce.

(c) In developing the regulations, the department shall consider relevant information on reduction programs and approaches in other states, localities, and nations, including, but not limited to, the European Union, India, Costa Rica, China, Chile, and Canada, and international standards, including, but not limited to, ISO 18602.

(d) In adopting regulations pursuant to this section, the department shall ensure the regulations, and activities conducted in accordance with the regulations, avoid or minimize disproportionate
 impacts to disadvantaged or low-income communities or rural areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 187.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42060.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), and (e), all local jurisdictions or recycling service providers shall include in their collection and recycling programs all covered material contained on the lists published pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 42061. This section does not authorize the department to require mandatory route collection service where it does not already exist. This section shall not limit a local jurisdiction from collecting additional materials for recycling or composting.

(b) The department shall grant an extension of, or exemption from, a requirement of subdivision (a) upon a written showing by the local jurisdiction or recycling service provider that compliance with the requirement is not practicable for a
 specific identified covered material because of specific local conditions, circumstances, or challenges. If the PRO objects to the extension or exemption, the PRO shall be responsible for arranging alternative means for the collection, processing, storage, and transportation of covered materials resulting from implementing this chapter. The department shall review a granted extension or exemption every two years, and may renew the extension or exemption after that review. An exemption or extension for a local jurisdiction or recycling service provider does not in any way relieve a producer or PRO from meeting the requirements of this chapter.

(c) A county board of supervisors of a rural county or a rural jurisdiction, as those terms are defined in Section 42649.8, may adopt a resolution to exempt the rural county or rural jurisdiction from the requirements of this section. If a rural jurisdiction is a regional agency composed of jurisdictions
 that are located entirely within one or more rural counties, the board of the regional agency may adopt a resolution, as prescribed in this subdivision, to exempt the rural jurisdiction from the requirements of this section. An exemption for a rural county or a rural jurisdiction does not in any way relieve a producer or PRO from meeting the requirements of this chapter.

(d) A local jurisdiction or recycling service provider shall not be required to collect material for recycling or composting on the lists published pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 42061 that does not meet the criteria described in subdivision (l) of Section 42051.1 and is collected and recycled or composted by means other than curbside collection in a producer responsibility plan.

(e) A local jurisdiction shall not be required to collect a material category that is subject to an ordinance